grammars/class.nouns.lexc
[V.Noun]:mawahmawah^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:mayh^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:mayhbang^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:mayhmayh^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:medjek^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:merlbbe^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:merlemerle^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:mibbarr^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:middurru^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:midj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:milekarrkarr^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:mim^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:mimdjanj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:mimih^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:miri^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:mirrh^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:modjarrkdorrinj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:modjarrkki^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:modjdje^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:morl^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:morlah^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:morlehmorlenj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:mud^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:muddika^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:mulbbu^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:murnubbarr^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:murru^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:ngabba^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:ngabbard^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:ngadburrung^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:ngadjadj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:ngakngak^ NominalSuffixes ;

LEXICON PlaceNouns
[Noun.place]:arrkuluk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[Noun.place]:birrirddak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[Noun.place]:kabbari^ NominalSuffixes ;
[Noun.place]:kalarabirr^ NominalSuffixes ;
[Noun.place]:djowkkeng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[Noun.place]:kunbarlanja^ NominalSuffixes ;
[Noun.place]:manmoyi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[Noun.place]:mardbalk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[Noun.place]:marrkolidjban^ NominalSuffixes ;
[Noun.place]:minjdjilang^ NominalSuffixes ;
[Noun.place]:warruwi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[Noun.place]:nawarddeken^ NominalSuffixes ;

LEXICON NominalDeverbals
[NOUN.deverbal]:yawmang^ # ;
[NOUN.deverbal]:danginj^ # ;

LEXICON NominalPrefixes
[LOC]:ku^  AllNounClasses ; ! locative prefix, ie kuwardde == escarpment, or "the rocky place"
[CLITIC.in]:mi^ AllNounClasses ; ! mingarre: in the vine forest, mikurrurla: in the sea, mikuwardde: in the rocks 

LEXICON NominalSuffixes
[GEN]:kenh # ;
[GEN]:ken # ;
[TURN]:wali # ;  
[LACK]:yak # ;
[LOC]:waken # ;
[DYADIC]:ko # ;
0:0 #;
